Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-101
Adams.

The county of Adams is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township five, north, of range twelve, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township five, north, of range nine, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township eight, north, of range nine, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township eight, north, of range twelve, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 2, p. 212;

R.S.1913, § 813;

C.S.1922, § 715;

C.S.1929, § 25-102;

R.S.1943, § 22-101.